Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Article 5. Mechanics and Stablekeepers.

§ 85-7-101.
Articles constructed, manufactured or repaired; lien for labor and materials.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 85-7-107, all carriages, buggies, wagons, plows, or any article constructed, manufactured or repaired for any person, and at his instance, shall be liable for the price of the labor and material employed in constructing, manufacturing or repairing the same; and the mechanic to whom the price of said labor and material may be due shall have the right to retain possession of such things so constructed, manufactured or repaired until the price be paid; and if the same shall not be paid within thirty (30) days, he may commence his suit in any court of competent jurisdiction and upon proof of the value of the labor and materials employed in such repairs, manufacture or construction, he shall be entitled to judgment against the party for whom such labor was done or materials furnished, with costs, as in other cases, and to a special order for the sale of the property retained in his possession for the payment thereof, with costs, and to an execution, as in other cases, for the residue of what remains unpaid after sale of the property.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1383; 1892, § 2715; 1906, § 3075; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2435; 1930, § 2255; 1942, § 353; Laws, 1988, ch. 542, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 85-7-103.
Stable keepers; lien on animals.

The owner of every livery stable, sale stable, feed stable or public pasture shall have a lien on every horse, mule, cow, or other animal for the price of feeding, grooming, training, grazing, or keeping the same, at the instance of the owner of the animal, and shall have the right to retain possession of the animal until such price be paid. If the price be not paid in ten (10) days after it is due, the person to whom it is owing may commence suit therefor before a justice of the peace where the principal of the amount does not exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), and in the circuit court where it exceeds that sum, setting forth the amount of the debt, how it accrued, and a description of the animal; and, upon proof of the debt that it is due for feeding, grooming, training, grazing or keeping the animal, he shall be entitled to judgment against the owner for the amount due and sued for and the price of feeding, grooming, training, grazing and keeping the animal since the institution of the suit if the whole amount do not exceed the jurisdiction of the court, with costs as in other cases, and to a special order and execution for the sale of the property upon which the lien exists for the payment of such judgment and costs, and to an execution, as in other cases, for the residue of what remains unpaid after sale of the property. The lien created by this section shall be subordinate to any prior encumbrance on such animal of which the owner of the stable had notice, actual or constructive, unless the animal were fed, groomed, trained, grazed or kept by the consent of the encumbrancer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2722; 1906, § 3082; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2442; 1930, § 2256; 1942, § 354; Laws, 1888, p. 94; Laws, 1934, ch. 311.

§ 85-7-105.
Remedy where lienholder loses possession to owner.

If the lienholders mentioned in Sections 85-7-101 and 85-7-103 part with possession of the property, they shall retain their liens while the property remains in the hands of the owner, or one deriving title or possession through him, with notice that the price of the labor and materials or the price of feeding, grooming, training, grazing or keeping the same was unpaid, and may enforce the same in like manner as is provided in Sections 85-7-31 and 85-7-53.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1383; 1892, § 2715; 1906, § 3075; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2435; 1930, § 2257; 1942, § 355; Laws, 1968, ch. 303, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved August 6, 1968).

§ 85-7-107.
Lien on motor vehicle for labor and materials used in constructing, manufacturing or repairing vehicle; notice to legal owner and holder of any lien; judgment on lien; redemption; sale of vehicle.

All motor vehicles repaired for any person, and at his instance, shall be liable for the price of the labor and material employed in constructing, manufacturing or repairing the same; and the mechanic to whom the price of said labor and material may be due shall have the right to retain possession of such motor vehicles so repaired until the price be paid. If such price shall not be paid within thirty (30) days, and the person to whom such charges are payable and owing intends to commence suit as provided in this section, such person shall notify, by certified mail, the legal owner and the holder of any lien of the amount of charges due thereon and provide an opportunity for redemption. If such property has not been redeemed within five (5) days after the mailing of such certified letter, the person to whom such charges are payable and owing may commence suit in any court of competent jurisdiction, and upon proof of the value of the labor and materials employed in such repairs, manufacture or construction, and that such labor and materials furnished were reasonably necessary to prevent deterioration, permit operation and preserve the property, shall be entitled to judgment against the party for whom such labor was done or materials furnished, with costs, as in other cases, and to a special order for the sale of the property retained in his possession for the payment thereof, with costs, and to an execution, as in other cases, for the residue of what remains unpaid after sale of the property. The proceeds of the sale of such property in excess of the amount needed to pay the judgment and necessary expenses of the procedure required by this section shall be held by the person for a period of six (6) months, and if not reclaimed by the owner thereof within that time shall become the property of the county and be paid over to the chancery clerk of the county in which the sale was held to be deposited into the county general fund, subject however to any rights of recorded lienholders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.